zh-TW: 調音機制: 螺栓調音 (鼓耳); 固定 (不可調音); 鼓耳調音 (調音鼓耳); 弦軸調音; 繩索張力 (綁繩式); 繩索調音; 其他
el: Μηχανισμός κουρδίσματος: Κουρδιστό με βίδες (κλειδί); Σταθερό (μη κουρδιζόμενο); Κουρδιστό με κλειδιά (κλειδιά κουρδίσματος); Κουρδιστό με στριφτάρια; Με τάση σχοινιού (πλεχτό); Κουρδιστό με σχοινιά; Άλλο
fi: Viritysmekanismi: Pulttiviritettävä (viritinpesä); Kiinteä (ei viritettävä); Pesäviritettävä (viritinpesät); Tappiviritettävä; Köysiviritettävä (punottu); Köysiviritettävä; Muu
ja: チューニングメカニズム: ボルトチューニング (ラグ); 固定式 (チューニング不可); ラグチューニング (チューニングラグ); ペグチューニング; ロープテンション (レース張り); ロープチューニング; その他
fr: Mécanisme d’accordage: Accordage par boulon (tirant); Fixe (non accordable); Accordage par tirant; Accordage par cheville; Tension par corde (laçage); Accordage par corde; Autre
da: Stemmemekanisme: Bolt-stemt (lug); Fast (kan ikke stemmes); Lug-stemt (stemmeskruer); Stempind-stemt; Rebspænding (snøret); Reb-stemt; Andet
sk-SK: Ladiaci mechanizmus: Ladenie skrutkami (úchyty); Pevné (neladiteľné); Ladenie úchytmi (ladiace úchyty); Ladenie kolíkmi; Napínanie lanom (šnurované); Ladenie lanom; Iný
pt-BR: Mecanismo de afinação: Afinação por parafuso (canoa); Fixo (não afinável); Afinação por canoa (canoas de afinação); Afinação por cravelha; Tensão por corda (trançada); Afinação por corda; Outro
ru: Механизм настройки: Болтовой (лаги); Фиксированный (ненастраиваемый); Лаговый (настроечные лаги); Колковый; Веревочный (шнуровка); Веревочный; Другое
nl: Stemmechanisme: Boutgespannen (spanblok); Vaste spanning (niet-stembaar); Spanblokgespannen (stemblokken); Pengespannen; Touwgespannen (geregen); Touwgespannen; Anders
de: Stimmmechanismus: Schraubenspannung (Spannböckchen); Fixiert (nicht stimmbar); Spannböckchen; Wirbelstimmung; Seilspannung (geschnürt); Seilstimmung; Sonstiges
es: Mecanismo de afinación: Afinación por perno (bellota); Fija (no afinable); Afinación por bellota (bellotas de afinación); Afinación por clavija; Tensión por cuerda (entrelazada); Afinación por cuerda; Otro
tr: Akort mekanizması: Cıvata akortlu (bijon); Sabit (akort edilemez); Bijon akortlu (akort bijonları); Burgu akortlu; İp gerilimli (bağcıklı); İp akortlu; Diğer
sv: Stämningsmekanism: Skruvstämd (stämskruv); Fast (ej stämbar); Skruvstämd (stämskruvar); Pinnstämd; Repspänd (snörd); Repstämd; Annat
vi: Cơ chế điều chỉnh: Chỉnh bằng bu-lông (vấu); Cố định (không thể chỉnh); Chỉnh bằng vấu (vấu chỉnh âm); Chỉnh bằng chốt; Căng bằng dây thừng (buộc dây); Chỉnh bằng dây thừng; Khác
sl-SI: Mehanizem uglaševanja: Uglasitev z vijaki (nastavki); Fiksno (ni mogoče uglasiti); Uglasitev z nastavki; Uglasitev z zatiči; Napetost vrvi (prepleteno); Uglasitev z vrvjo; Drugo
pt-PT: Mecanismo de afinação: Afinação por parafuso; Fixo (não afinável); Afinação por tensores; Afinação por cravelhas; Tensão por corda (entrançado); Afinação por corda; Outro
hr-HR: Mehanizam za podešavanje: Ugađanje vijcima (ušica); Fiksno (ne može se ugađati); Ugađanje ušicama (ušice za ugađanje); Ugađanje klinovima; Zatezanje užetom (isprepleteno); Ugađanje užetom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Механизъм за настройване: Болтово настройване (лъгове); Фиксиран (без настройка); С лъгове (настройващи лъгове); С ключове (щифтове); Въжено обтягане (сплитане); Въжено настройване; Друг
ro-RO: Mecanismul de acordare: Acordat cu șuruburi (bride); Fix (neacordabil); Acordat cu bride (bride de acordaj); Acordat cu cuie; Tensionat cu frânghie (împletit); Acordat cu frânghie; Altele
zh-CN: 调谐机制: 螺栓调音（鼓耳）; 固定（不可调音）; 鼓耳调音（调音鼓耳）; 弦轴调音; 绳索张力（编织式）; 绳索调音; 其他
en: Tuning mechanism: Bolt-tuned (lug); Fixed (non-tunable); Lug-tuned (tuning lugs); Peg-tuned; Rope-tension (laced); Rope-tuned; Other
ko: 조율 방식: 볼트 튜닝(러그); 고정식(튜닝 불가); 러그 튜닝(튜닝 러그); 페그 튜닝; 로프 텐션(레이스); 로프 튜닝; 기타
cs: Mechanismus ladění: Laditelné šrouby (mušle); Pevné (neladitelné); Laditelné šrouby (ladicí mušle); Laditelné kolíčky; Provazové napínání (šněrované); Laditelné provazem; Ostatní
pl: Mechanizm strojenia: Śrubowe (lugi); Stałe (niestrojalne); Śrubowe (lugi strojeniowe); Kołkowe (strojone kołkami); Naciąg sznurowy (pleciony); Strojone sznurkiem; Inne
it: Meccanismo di regolazione: A tiranti (blocchetti); Fisso (non intonabile); A blocchetti (blocchetti di intonazione); A piroli; Tensione a corda (allacciata); Intonazione a corda; Altro
hu: Hangolómechanizmus: Csavaros hangolású (baba); Fix (nem hangolható); Babás hangolású (hangolóbabák); Kulcsos hangolású; Kötélfeszítésű (fűzött); Kötélhangolású; Egyéb
lt-LT: Derinimo mechanizmas: Varžtinis derinimas (su kilpomis); Fiksuotas (nederinamas); Derinama kilpomis (derinimo kilpos); Derinama kuoliukais; Virvinis įtempimas (suvarstyta); Derinama virvėmis; Kita
nb: Stemmemekanisme: Boltestemt (lugs); Fast (ikke stembar); Lug-stemt (stemmeskruer); Skruestemt; Tauspenning (snøring); Taustemt; Annet
th: กลไกการปรับแต่ง: ปรับจูนด้วยโบลต์ (สลัก); คงที่ (ปรับจูนไม่ได้); ปรับจูนด้วยสลัก (สลักปรับจูน); ปรับจูนด้วยลูกบิด; ความตึงเชือก (ร้อยเชือก); ปรับจูนด้วยเชือก; อื่นๆ